Hawaii statutes.
§327-10 Manner of making, amending, or
revoking an anatomical gift of decedent's body or body part. (a) A person
authorized to make an anatomical gift under section 327-9 may make an
anatomical gift by a document of gift signed by the person making the gift or
that person's oral communication that is electronically recorded or is
contemporaneously reduced to a record and signed by the individual receiving
the oral communication.

(b) Subject to subsection (c), an anatomical
gift by a person authorized under section 327-9 may be amended or revoked
orally or in a record by any member of a prior class who is reasonably
available; provided that any response other than an express, contrary
indication regarding the decedent's anatomical gift shall prohibit amendment or
revocation of an anatomical gift of the decedent's body or body parts. If more
than one member of the prior class is reasonably available, the gift made by a
person authorized under section 327-9 may be amended or revoked only if a
majority of the reasonably available members of that class agree to the
amending or revoking of the gift; provided that any response other than an
express, contrary indication by the majority of the reasonably available
members of that class regarding the decedent's anatomical gift shall prohibit
amendment or revocation of an anatomical gift of the decedent's body or body
parts.

(c) A revocation under subsection (b) is
effective only if the procurement organization or transplant hospital or the
physician or technician knows of the revocation before an incision has been
made to remove a body part from the donor, or before invasive procedures have
begun to prepare the recipient. [L 2008, c 122, pt of §1; am L 2010, c 156, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next